Utah statutes.
4-30-1.   Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1)  "Consignor" or "shipper" means any person who consigns, ships, or
delivers livestock to a livestock market for storage, handling, or sale.
(2) (a) "Livestock market" means a public market place consisting of pens or
other enclosures where all classes of livestock or poultry are received on
consignment and kept for subsequent sale, either through public auction or
private sale.
(b)  "Livestock market" does not include:
(i)  a place used solely for liquidation of livestock by a farmer, dairyman,
livestock breeder, or feeder who is going out of such business; or
(ii)  a place where an association of livestock breeders or an individual
livestock breeder offers registered livestock or breeding sires for sale and
assumes all responsibility for the sale, guarantees title to the livestock or
sires sold, and arranges with the department for brand inspection of all
animals sold.
(3)  "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, or association.
